North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 28B. Regulation of Production, Distribution, etc., of Milk and Cream. [Repealed]

§§ 106-266.7 through 106-266.21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-199, s. 27(a), effective August 17, 2004.

History.

S. 106-266.7; 1953, c. 1338, s. 2; 1955, c. 406, ss. 2, 3; c. 1287, s. 1; 1965, c. 213; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1975, c. 78, ss. 1, 1.5, 2; 1983, c. 717, ss. 22, 93-98; 1995, c. 490, s. 35. s. 106-266.8; 1953, c. 1338, s. 3; 1955, c. 1287, s. 2; 1959, c. 1292; 1963, c. 797, ss. 1-3; 1965, c. 936, s. 1; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1973, c. 811; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 69, s. 4; 1977, c. 426, ss. 2, 3; c. 629; 1987, c. 285, s. 18; c. 827, s. 23. s. 106-266.9; 1953, c. 1338, s. 4; 1955, c. 406, s. 4; 1963, c. 797, ss. 2, 4, 41/2; 1971, c. 779, s. 1. s. 106-266.10; 1953, c. 1338, s. 5; 1971, c. 779, s. 1. s. 106-266.11; 1953, c. 1338, s. 6; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1062, s. 4. s. 106-266.12; 1953, c. 1338, s. 7; 1971, c. 779, s. 1. s. 106.266.13; 1953, c. 1338, s. 10; 1971, c. 779, s. 1. s. 106-266.14; 1953, c. 1338, s. 11; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 754; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c). s. 106-266.15; 1953, c. 1338, s. 12; 1969, c. 44, s. 67; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 24. s. 106-266.16; 1953, c. 1338, s. 13; 1971, c. 779, s. 1. s. 106-266.17; 1953, c. 1338, s. 14; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-502, s. 7. s. 106-266.18; 1953, c. 1338, s. 141/2; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1977, c. 426, s. 4. s. 106-266.19; 1955, c. 406, s. 1; 1959, c. 1021; 1965, c. 936, s. 2; 1971, c. 779, s. 1; 1975, c. 815; repealed by 2004-199, s. 27(a), effective August 17, 2004.

§§ 106-266.22 through 106-266.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.